Maryland, session 2025, HB1143.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
4–308.
(f) (1) Except as provided in subsection (k) of this section, while it is effective,
a general license to practice dental hygiene issued under this title authorizes the licensee
to practice dental hygiene:
(i) Under the supervision of a licensed dentist who is:
1. On the premises and available for personal consultation
while the services are being performed; or
2. Not on the premises while authorized dental hygiene
services are provided when the requirements of subsection (l) OR (N) of this section have
been fully satisfied; and
(ii) Only in a:
1. Dental office;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 753
2. Dental clinic;
3. Hospital;
4. School;
5. Charitable institution; or
6. Health maintenance organization certified by the State
Insurance Commissioner.
(N) WHILE IT IS EFFECTIVE, A GENERAL LICENSE TO PRACTICE DENTAL
HYGIENE ISSUED UNDER THIS TITLE AUTHORIZES THE LICENSEE TO PRACTICE
DENTAL HYGIENE UNDER THE GENERAL SUPERVISION OF A LICENSED DENTIST IN A
SCHOOL OR SCHOOL–BASED HEALTH CENTER IF THE LICENSEE SUBMITS ON A FORM
PROVIDED BY THE BOARD A STATEMENT THAT THE LICENSEE INTENDS TO
PRACTICE IN A SCHOOL OR SCHOOL–BASED HEALTH CENTER.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) There is a Maryland Collaborative to Improve Children’s Oral Health Through
School–Based Programs.
(b) The Collaborative consists of the following members:
(1) two members of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) two members of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of
the House;
(3) the Secretary of Health, or the Secretary’s designee;
(4) the Secretary of Education, or the Secretary’s designee;
(5) the Deputy Secretary of Public Health Services, or the Deputy
Secretary’s designee;
(6) the Chair of the Maryland Community Health Resources Commission,
or the Chair’s designee; and
(7) the following members, appointed by the Secretary of Health:
(i) one representative of the Maryland Medical Assistance Program;
– 3 –

Ch. 753 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) one representative of the Maryland Association of School Health
Nurses;
(iii) one representative of the Maryland Assembly of School–Based
Health Care;
(iv) one representative of the Maryland Dental Action Coalition;
(v) one representative of the Maryland Dental Hygienists’
Association;
(vi) one representative of the Maryland State Dental Association;
(vii) one representative of the Maryland Dental Society;
(viii) one representative of the State Board of Dental Examiners;
(vii) (ix) one representative of a federally qualified health center
that manages a school–based dental program;
(viii) (x) one representative of the Maryland Association of Boards
of Education;
(ix) (xi) one representative of the Public School Superintendents’
Association of Maryland; and
(x) (xii) one representative of the National Maternal and Child
Health Resource Center.
(c) The Secretary of Health shall designate the chair of the Collaborative.
(d) The Maryland Department of Health shall provide staff for the Collaborative.
(e) A member of the Collaborative:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Collaborative; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Collaborative shall study and make recommendations to improve the oral
health of children in the State through school–based dental programs by analyzing the
impact of:
(1) supporting schools and community dental partners in linking families
and children to permanent dental facilities;
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 753
(2) increasing the number of dental hygienists providing school–based
services through policy initiatives, including grant support for services for uninsured
children and Medicaid reimbursement of dental hygienists who render dental services;
(3) authorizing school nurses to provide fluoride varnishes among other
clinically appropriate services by modifying school health guidelines and providing
reimbursement through the Maryland Medical Assistance Program;
(4) expanding the capacity of school–based health centers to provide dental
services; and
(5) clarifying the law governing the practice of dental hygienists in school
settings to reduce confusion among practitioners and school–based programs; and
(5) (6) other innovative models for providing dental services to children in
schools.
(g) The Collaborative may consult with any other individual or organization with
expertise in school–based dental programs.
(h) (1) On or before December 1, 2025, the Collaborative shall submit an
interim report of its findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with
§ 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
(2) On or before October 1, 2026, the Collaborative shall submit a final
report of its findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 3. 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
July 1, 2025. Section 2 of this Act It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and, at
the end of June 30, 2027, Section 2 of this Act, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 5 –